Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-640
Manufacturer-distributor; lottery equipment or supplies sales and leases; restrictions.

(1) No manufacturer-distributor shall sell, lease, or otherwise provide any lottery equipment or supplies to any person in Nebraska except a county, city, or village licensed to conduct a lottery, a licensed lottery operator, or another licensed manufacturer-distributor. No county, city, or village licensed to conduct a lottery or a licensed lottery operator shall purchase, lease, or otherwise obtain any lottery equipment or supplies except from a manufacturer-distributor licensed in Nebraska.

(2) Nothing in this section shall prohibit (a) a licensed county, city, village, or lottery operator which has purchased or intends to purchase new lottery equipment from selling or donating its old lottery equipment to another licensed county, city, village, or lottery operator if prior written approval has been obtained from the department or (b) a county, city, village, or lottery operator which has voluntarily canceled its license or allowed its license to lapse or which has had its license suspended, canceled, or revoked from selling or donating its lottery equipment to another licensed county, city, village, or lottery operator if prior written approval has been obtained from the department.

Laws 1989, LB 767, § 80;

Laws 1991, LB 427, § 62.